Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-939
University of Nebraska; continuing education services; statewide responsibility.

The University of Nebraska shall have statewide responsibility for continuing education services at the baccalaureate, graduate, and professional levels.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 23.